District of Columbia statutes.
1-307.05

Children’s Health Insurance Program.

(a)

The Mayor may submit a state child health plan and modifications to the plan to the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services (“Secretary”), to enable the District to receive federal assistance under title XXI of the Social Security Act, approved August 5, 1997 (Pub.L. No. 105-33; 42 U.S.C. § 1397aa et seq.).

(b)

The Mayor may take such action, in accordance with the rules issued by the Mayor pursuant to this part, as may be necessary to submit the plan to the Secretary and to establish and carry out the Children’s Health Insurance Program.

History

Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-38, § 2203, 46 DCR 6373

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-307.03 and § 1-307.06.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-360.2.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 2203 of the Service Improvement and Fiscal Year 2000 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-110, July 28, 1999, 46 DCR 6320).